Tennessee, session 114, SB0432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-2-101(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "ten (10)" and substituting instead the language "twenty (20)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0432
001405
- 1 -